Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-477
Conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman.

Any commissioned officer or cadet, who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 77, p. 1579.